Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 5.1 Interception of Wire and Oral Communications

12-5.1-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Aggrieved person” means an individual who was a party to any intercepted wire, electronic, or oral communication or against whom the interception was directed.

“Communications common carrier” has the same meaning given the term “common carrier” by 47 U.S.C. § 153(11).

“Contents,” when used with respect to any wire, electronic, or oral communication, includes any information concerning the identity of the parties to that communication or the existence, substance, purport, or meaning of that communication.

“Designated offense” means the offenses of:

Murder, robbery, kidnapping, extortion, assault with a dangerous weapon, and assault with intent to rob or murder;

Arson in the first degree, arson in the second degree, or arson in the third degree;

Bribery or larceny involving the receipt of stolen property of a value of more than five hundred dollars ($500);

Any violation of chapter 28 of title 21 where the offense is punishable by imprisonment for more than one year;

Any violation of chapters 19, 47, or 51 of title 11, where the offense is punishable by imprisonment for more than one year;

The lending of money at a rate of interest in violation of law;

Being a fugitive from justice for any of the offenses provided in this subdivision;

Any violation of chapter 67.1 of title 11 where the offense is punishable by imprisonment for more than one year; and

Conspiracy to commit any of the offenses provided in this subdivision.

“Electronic communication” means any transfer of signs, signals, writing, images, sounds, data, or intelligence of any nature transmitted in whole or in part by a wire, radio, electromagnetic, photoelectronic or photooptical system, but does not include:

Any wire or oral communication;

Any communication made through a tone-only paging device; or

Any communication from a tracking device.

“Electronic communication service” means any service which provides to users the ability to send or receive wire or electronic communications.

“Electronic, mechanical, or other device” means any device or apparatus which can be used to intercept wire, electronic, or oral communications other than:

Any telephone or telegraph instrument, equipment, or facility or any component of telephone or telegraph instruments, equipment, or facilities, furnished to the subscriber or user by a provider of wire or electronic communication service in the ordinary course of its business, and being used by the subscriber or user in the ordinary course of business, or by an investigative or law enforcement officer in the ordinary course of his or her duties; or

A hearing aid or similar device which is being used to correct subnormal hearing to normal.

“Intercept” means aural or other acquisition of the contents of any wire, electronic, or oral communication through the use of any electronic, mechanical, or other device.

“Investigative or law enforcement officer” means any officer of the United States, this state, or a political subdivision of this state, who is empowered by law to conduct investigations of, or to make arrests for, the designated offenses, the attorney general, and his or her assistants.

“Oral communications” means any oral communication uttered by a person exhibiting an expectation that the communication is not subject to interception under circumstances justifying that expectation, but the term does not include any electronic communication.

“Person” means any individual, partnership, association, joint stock company, trust, or corporation, whether or not any of the foregoing is an officer, agent, or employee of the United States, a state, or a political subdivision of a state.

“User” means any person or entity who:

Uses an electronic communication service; and

Is duly authorized by the provider of the service to engage in that use; photooptical or photoelectronic facilities for the transmission of electronic communications, and any computer facilities or related electronic equipment for the electronic storage of the communications.

“Wire communications” means any aural transfer made in whole or in part through the use of facilities for the transmission of communications by the aid of wire, cable, or other like connection between the point of origin and the point of reception (including the use of the connection in a switching station), furnished or operated by any person engaged in providing or operating the facilities for the transmission of communications. The term includes any electronic storage of the communication.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 144, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 127, § 2; P.L. 1980, ch. 42, § 1; 1985, ch. 348, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 3, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 167, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 2, § 4; P.L. 2022, ch. 53, § 1, effective June 7, 2022; P.L. 2022, ch. 54, § 1, effective June 7, 2022.

12-5.1-2.
Application for orders.

The attorney general, or an assistant attorney general specially designated by the attorney general, may apply ex parte to the presiding justice of the superior court of competent jurisdiction for an order authorizing the interception of any wire, electronic, or oral communications. Each application ex parte for an order must be in writing, subscribed and sworn to by the applicant.

The application must contain:

The identity of the officer making the application;

A full and complete statement of the facts and circumstances relied upon by the applicant to justify his or her belief that an order should be issued, including:

Details as to the particular designated offense that has been, is being, or is about to be committed;

A particular description of the nature and location of the facilities from which, or the place where, the communication is to be intercepted;

A particular description of the type of communications sought to be intercepted; and

The identity of the person, if known, committing the offense and whose communications are to be intercepted;

A full and complete statement as to whether or not other investigative procedures have been tried and failed or why they reasonably appear to be unlikely to succeed if tried or to be too dangerous;

A statement of the period of time for which the interception is required to be maintained. If the nature of the investigation is such that the authorization of interception should not automatically terminate when the described type of communication has been first obtained, a particular description of facts establishing probable cause to believe that additional communications of the same type will occur after the described type of communication has been first obtained;

A full and complete statement of the facts concerning all previous applications, known to the individual making the application, made to the presiding justice of the superior court for authorization to intercept wire, electronic, or oral communications involving any of the same persons, facilities or places specified in the application, and the action taken by the presiding justice of the superior court on each application; and

Where the application is for the extension of an order, a statement setting forth the results thus far obtained from the interception, or a reasonable explanation of the failure to obtain the results.

The presiding justice of the superior court may require the applicant to furnish additional testimony or documentary evidence in support of the application.

Allegations of fact in the application may be based either upon the personal knowledge of the applicant or upon information and belief. If the applicant personally knows the fact alleged, it must be so stated. If the facts establishing reasonable cause are derived in whole or in part from the statements of persons other than the applicant, the sources of the information and belief must be either disclosed or described, and the application must contain facts establishing the existence and reliability of the informant, or the reliability of the information supplied by the informant. The application must also state, so far as possible, the basis of the informant’s knowledge or belief. If the applicant’s information and belief is derived from tangible evidence or recorded oral evidence, a copy or detailed description of the evidence should be annexed to or included in the application. Affidavits of persons other than the applicant must be submitted in conjunction with the application if they tend to support any fact or conclusion alleged in the application. Accompanying affidavits may be based either on personal knowledge of the affiant, or information and belief with the source of the information and reason for the belief specified.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 167, § 2.

Participant Monitoring.

In situations where an individual consents to having his communications monitored, §

11-35-21(c)(2)

, and not this chapter, applies. State v. Ahmadjian, 438 A.2d 1070,

1981 R.I. LEXIS 1423

(R.I. 1981).

Participant monitoring is not governed by this chapter. State v. Williams, 752 A.2d 951,

2000 R.I. LEXIS 139

(R.I. 2000).

12-5.1-3.
Where application may be made.

Application for an order to intercept wire, electronic, or oral communication may be made to the presiding justice of the superior court or the senior associate justice of the superior court whenever the presiding justice shall deem it necessary to disqualify himself or herself from entering the order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 167, § 2.

12-5.1-4.
Issuance of orders.

Upon the application as provided in §

12-5.1-2

the presiding justice of the superior court, or the senior associate justice of the superior court when the presiding justice shall disqualify himself or herself from entering the order, may enter an ex parte order, as required or as modified, authorizing the interception of wire, electronic, or oral communications if the presiding justice of the superior court determines on the basis of the facts submitted by the applicant that:

There is probable cause for belief that an individual is committing, has committed, or is about to commit a particular designated offense;

There is probable cause for belief that particular communications concerning that offense will be obtained through the interception;

Normal investigative procedures have been tried and have failed or reasonably appear to be unlikely to succeed if tried, or to be too dangerous;

There is probable cause for belief that the facilities from which, or the place where, the wire, electronic, or oral communications are to be intercepted, are being used, or are about to be used, in connection with the commission of the offense, or are leased to, listed in the name of, or commonly used by the individual.

If the facilities from which a wire, electronic, or oral communication is to be intercepted are public, no order of authorization shall be issued unless the court, in addition to the matters provided in subsection (a) of this section, determines that there is a special need to intercept wire communications over the facilities.

If the facilities from which, or the place where, the wire, electronic, or oral communications are to be intercepted, are being used, or are about to be used, or are leased to, listed in the name of, or commonly used by, a licensed attorney-at-law, or an ordained minister of the gospel, priest, or rabbi of any denomination, or is a place used primarily for habitation by a husband and wife, no order shall be issued unless the presiding justice of the superior court, in addition to the matters provided in subsection (a) of this section, determines that there is a special need to intercept wire, electronic, or oral communications over those facilities or in those places, and that the interceptions will be so conducted as to minimize or eliminate interception of privileged communication between lawyers and clients, clergy and confidants, or husbands and wives.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 167, § 2.

12-5.1-5.
Form and content of orders.

Each order authorizing the interception of any wire, electronic, or oral communication shall specify:

The identity, or a particular description of the person, if known, whose communications are to be intercepted;

The nature and location of the communications facilities as to which, or the place where, authority to intercept is granted;

A particular description of the type of communications sought to be intercepted, and a statement of the particular offense to which they relate;

The identity of the agency authorized to intercept the communications; and

The period of time during which the interception is authorized, including a statement as to whether or not the interception shall automatically terminate when the described communication has been first obtained.

No order entered under this section may authorize the interception of any wire, electronic, or oral communication for any period longer than is necessary to achieve the objective of the authorization, nor in any event longer than thirty (30) days. Extensions of an order may be granted, but only upon application for an extension made in accordance with §

12-5.1-2

and the court making the findings required by §

12-5.1-4

. The period of extension shall be no longer than the presiding justice of the superior court deems necessary to achieve the purposes for which it was granted and in no event for longer than thirty (30) days. Every order and extension shall contain a provision that the authorization to intercept shall be executed as soon as practicable, shall be conducted in such a way as to minimize the interception of communications not otherwise subject to interception under this chapter, and must terminate upon attainment of the authorized objective, or in any event in thirty (30) days.

Whenever an order authorizing interception is entered pursuant to this chapter, the order may require reports to be made to the presiding justice of the superior court who issued the order showing what progress has been made toward achievement of the authorized objective and the need for continued interception. These reports shall be made at any intervals that the presiding justice of the superior court may require.

A court order issued by a judge of competent jurisdiction authorizing the interception of a wire, electronic, or oral communication may direct an officer, employee, or agent of any communications common carrier or electronic communications service to provide information, facilities, and technical assistance to the applicant attorney general or an assistant attorney general specially designated by the attorney general or law enforcement officer or agency who, pursuant to this chapter, is designated to intercept a wire, electronic, or oral communication. The communications common carrier or electronic communication service shall, if ordered, immediately furnish the applicant attorney general or assistant attorney general specially designated by the attorney general all information, facilities, and technical assistance necessary to accomplish the interception unobtrusively and with a minimum of interference with the services that the communications carrier or electronic communication service is according the person whose communications are to be intercepted. A communications common carrier or electronic communication service shall furnish the information, facilities, and technical assistance at its prevailing rate or tariffs to the applicant attorney general or assistant attorney general specially designated by the attorney general or law enforcement officer or agency so designated to intercept a wire, electronic, or oral communication.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 167, § 2.

12-5.1-6.
Approval of interception of wire, electronic, or oral communication.

An order of approval of the interception of any wire, electronic, or oral communication relating to an offense other than that specified in the order of authorization may be issued where the court finds on an application for an order of approval submitted in the same manner as an application for authorization as provided in §

12-5.1-2

that the interception was otherwise made in accordance with this chapter. This application shall be made as soon as practicable.

In addition to any other right to appeal, the state, by the attorney general, shall have the right to appeal from a denial of an order of approval made under this section. The appeal shall be claimed and taken in the manner provided by law and rule of court for prosecuting appeals in civil actions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 167, § 2.

12-5.1-7.
Execution of orders.

An order may be executed pursuant to its terms anywhere in the state.

An order may be personally executed by the authorized applicant or by other investigative or law enforcement officer designated by him or her or the presiding justice of the superior court for the purpose.

The order shall be executed according to its terms during the hours specified by the order, and for the authorized period, or a part of that period. Any device installed for the purpose of interception must be removed as soon after termination of the interception as practicable. Entry upon private premises for the removal of the device is deemed to be authorized by the warrant.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 55, § 1.

12-5.1-8.
Maintenance and custody of records.

The contents of any wire, electronic, or oral communication intercepted by any means authorized by this chapter shall, if practicable, be recorded on tape or wire or other comparable device. The recording of the contents of any wire, electronic, or oral communication under this section shall be done in such a way as will protect the recording from editing or other alterations. Immediately upon the expiration of the period of the order, or extensions of the order, the recordings shall be made available to the presiding justice of the superior court issuing the order and sealed under his or her directions. Custody of the recordings shall be wherever the presiding justice of the superior court orders. They shall not be destroyed except upon an order of the presiding justice of the superior court, and in any event, shall be kept for ten (10) years. Duplicate recordings may be made for use or disclosure pursuant to the provisions of §

12-5.1-10(a)

or (b) for investigations and bail hearings and any pre-trial hearings. The presence of the seal provided for by this section, or a satisfactory explanation for its absence, shall be a prerequisite for the use or disclosure of the contents of any wire, electronic, or oral communication or evidence derived from them at any bail hearing or pre-trial hearing.

Applications made and orders granted under this chapter shall be sealed by the presiding justice of the superior court. Custody of the applications and orders shall be wherever the presiding justice of the superior court directs. The applications and orders shall be disclosed only upon a showing of good cause before the presiding justice of the superior court and shall not be destroyed except on order of the presiding justice of the superior court, and in any event shall be kept for ten (10) years.

Any violation of the provisions of this section may be punished as contempt of the presiding justice of the superior court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 282, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 167, § 2.

12-5.1-9.
Return of inventory.

Within a reasonable time but not later than ninety (90) days after the termination of the period of the order or of extensions of the order, the presiding justice of the superior court shall cause to be served on the person named in the order or application, and any other parties to the intercepted communications that the presiding justice of the superior court may determine in his or her direction to be in the interest of justice, an inventory which shall include:

Notice of the entry of the order or the application for a denied order of approval;

The date of the entry of the order or the denial of the application for an order of approval;

The period of authorized, approved or disapproved interception;

The fact that during the period wire, electronic, or oral communications were or were not intercepted.

The judge, upon the filing of a motion, may in his or her discretion make available to the person or the person’s counsel for inspection any portions of the intercepted communications, applications, and orders that the judge determines to be in the interest of justice. On an ex parte showing of good cause to the judge, the serving of the inventory required by this section may be postponed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 167, § 2.

12-5.1-10.
Disclosure and use of intercepted wire or oral communications.

Any investigative or law enforcement officer who, by any means authorized by this chapter, has obtained knowledge of the contents of any wire, electronic, or oral communication, or evidence derived from them, may disclose the contents to another investigative or law enforcement officer to the extent that disclosure is appropriate to the proper performance of the official duties of the officer making or receiving the disclosure.

Any investigative or law enforcement officer who, by any means authorized by this chapter, has obtained knowledge of the contents of any wire, electronic, or oral communication or evidence derived from them may use the contents to the extent that their use is appropriate to the proper performance of his or her official duties.

Any person who has received, by any means authorized by this chapter, any information concerning a wire, electronic, or oral communication, or evidence derived from them intercepted in accordance with the provisions of this chapter may disclose the contents of that communication or the derivative evidence while giving testimony under oath or affirmation in any criminal proceeding in any court of the United States or of this or any other state or in any federal or state grand jury proceeding.

No otherwise privileged wire, electronic, or oral communication intercepted in accordance with, or in violation of, the provisions of this chapter shall lose its privileged character.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 167, § 2.

Participant Monitoring.

In situations where an individual consents to having his communications monitored, §

11-35-21(c)(2)

, and not this chapter, applies. State v. Ahmadjian, 438 A.2d 1070,

1981 R.I. LEXIS 1423

(R.I. 1981).

12-5.1-11.
Notice of intention.

The contents of any intercepted wire, electronic, or oral communication or evidence derived from them shall not be received in evidence or otherwise disclosed in any criminal proceeding unless each party, not less than ten (10) days before the proceeding has been furnished with a copy of the application, order, and inventory under which the interception was authorized or approved. This ten (10) day period may be waived by the judge if he or she finds that it was not possible to furnish the party with the information more than ten (10) days before the proceeding and that the party will not be prejudiced by the delay in receiving the information.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 167, § 2.

12-5.1-12.
Suppression of evidence.

Any aggrieved person may move to suppress the contents of any intercepted wire, electronic, or oral communication or evidence derived from them on the grounds that:

The communication was unlawfully intercepted;

The order under which it was intercepted is insufficient on its face;

The interception was not made in conformity with the order;

Service was not made as provided in §

12-5.1-11

; or

The seal provided in §

12-5.1-8(b)

is not present and there is no satisfactory explanation for its absence.

A motion under this section shall be made before the trial, unless there was no opportunity to make the motion or the person was not aware of the grounds of the motion. If the motion is granted, the contents of the intercepted wire, electronic, or oral communication, or evidence derived from them, shall be treated as having been obtained in violation of this chapter. The judge, upon the filing of the motion by the aggrieved person, may in his or her discretion make available to the aggrieved person or the person’s counsel for inspection any portions of the intercepted communication or evidence derived from them that the judge determines to be in the interests of justice.

If the motion shall be made before any court or judge other than the presiding justice of the superior court, the motion shall be transferred to the presiding justice of the superior court or to an associate justice of the superior court who shall be designated by the presiding justice, or by the associate justice in charge of the criminal calendar in Providence County whenever the presiding justice shall deem it necessary to disqualify himself or herself, for hearing and determination. No motion under this section shall be heard or determined by a district court in preliminary proceedings or otherwise.

In addition to any other right of appeal, the state, by the attorney general, shall have the right to appeal from an order allowing a motion to suppress made under this section. The appeal shall be taken within thirty (30) days after the date of allowance of the motion to suppress. If the motion to suppress is allowed prior to trial, the appeal shall be decided prior to trial. If the motion to suppress is allowed during trial and the attorney general shall claim an appeal, the evidence shall be admitted at trial, and the question of admissibility reserved for the supreme court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 167, § 2.

12-5.1-13.
Civil remedy.

Any person whose wire, electronic, or oral communication is intercepted, disclosed, or used in violation of this chapter shall have a civil cause of action against any person who intercepts, discloses, or uses the communications, and shall be entitled to recover from that person:

Actual damages, but not less than liquidated damages, computed at the rate of one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each day of violation, or one thousand dollars ($1,000), whichever is higher;

Punitive damages; and

Reasonable attorneys’ fees and other litigation disbursements reasonably incurred.

Good faith reliance on a court order issued under this chapter shall constitute a complete defense to any civil or criminal action brought under this section or any other law. Any communications common carrier and its employees shall be deemed to have acted in good faith upon receipt of a certified copy of the court order issued under this chapter and the representations of the attorney general or an assistant attorney general specially designated by the attorney general.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 121, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 167, § 2.

12-5.1-14.
Annual report of interceptions to the general assembly.

On the second Friday of January, of each year, the attorney general shall submit a report to the general assembly stating the number of applications made for orders during the previous year and the number of orders issued. In addition, the report shall provide, for each wiretap order and renewal:

A breakdown of the effective period of the wiretap;

The designation of the offenses for which the wiretap was sought;

The number of interceptions made by the wiretap during the reported year;

An indication whether any indictments were obtained as a result of those intercepts; (5) An indication, if any motions to suppress were made, whether the motions were granted; and

(6)

The prosecutorial results, if any, of the wiretap, including the criminal sentences imposed on any individual who pleads or is convicted of a crime in which wiretaps were instituted.

If the wiretap order is a renewal from a previous year, or a case is closed in which a wiretap order had been previously obtained, the report shall list with the information provided in subsection (a) of this section a separate breakdown of the information for prior years. The report shall not include any information of wiretaps which remain in operation at the time the report is filed. This report shall be a public document. The report shall also include the number of pen registers and trap and trace devices authorized.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 236, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 283, § 2.

12-5.1-15.
Conformity to the law of the United States.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, any court to which an application is made in accordance with this chapter may take any evidence, make any finding, or issue any order required to conform the proceedings or the issuance of any order of authorization or approval as provided in this chapter to the provisions of the Constitution of the United States or of any law of the United States.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 55, § 1.

12-5.1-16.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, its invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1969, ch. 55, § 1.